Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
PART 3
FARM PRODUCTS

35-36-301. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that farm products are commodities affected with a public interest and thus should be regulated for the protection of both the producer and the consumer.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 741, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-37-102 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-302. Application for license - rules.

A person shall not act as a dealer, small-volume dealer, or agent without having obtained a license as provided in this part 3. Every person acting as a dealer, small-volume dealer, or agent shall file an application in writing with the commissioner for a license to transact the business of dealer, small-volume dealer, or agent, and the application must be accompanied by the license fee provided for in section 35-36-303 for each specified class of business.

The application in each case must state the class or classes of farm products the applicant proposes to handle; the full name of the person applying for the license; and, if the applicant is a firm, exchange, association, or corporation, the full name of each member of the firm or the names of the officers of the exchange, association, or corporation. The application must further state the principal business address of the applicant in the state of Colorado and elsewhere and the names of the persons authorized to receive and accept service of summons and legal notices of all kinds for the applicant. The applicant shall further satisfy the commissioner of the applicant's character, responsibility, and good faith in seeking to carry on the business stated in the application. In determining a person's character, the commissioner shall comply with section 24-5-101.

In addition to the general requirements applicable to all classes of applications, as set forth in this section, each application for an agent's license must include such information as the commissioner may consider proper or necessary, and the application must include the name and address of the applicant and the name and address of each dealer or small-volume dealer represented or sought to be represented by the agent and the written endorsement or nomination of the dealer or small-volume dealer. A person shall not be licensed as an agent unless all of the agent's principals are licensed under this part 3.

Upon the applicant's filing of the proper application with the commissioner, accompanied by the proper fee, and when the commissioner is satisfied that the convenience and necessity of the industry and the public will be served by the application, the commissioner shall issue to the applicant a license entitling the applicant to conduct the business described in the application at the place named in the application until the date specified by the commissioner by rule or until the license has been suspended or revoked. The license of an agent expires upon the date of expiration of the license of the principal for whom the agent acts. The commissioner may also issue a license to each agent, with a separate agent's license being required for each principal. A dealer, small-volume dealer, or agent shall show the license upon the request of any interested person. Each licensed dealer, small-volume dealer, or agent shall post the person's license or a copy of the license in the person's office or salesroom in plain view of the public.

The commissioner shall revoke any license granted as a result of fraud or misrepresentation in applying for the license. All indicia of the possession of a license are at all times the property of the state of Colorado, and each licensee is entitled to the possession of a license only for the duration of the license.

Any person licensed under part 2 of this article 36 may apply for a license as a dealer or small-volume dealer without paying the license fee otherwise required by section 35-36-303.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 741, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-37-104 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-303. License fee - renewal - rules.

For filing the application described in section 35-36-302, each applicant for a license in each of the following categories shall pay to the commissioner a fee as determined by the commission, which fee shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for credit to the inspection and consumer services cash fund created in section 35-1-106.5:

Dealers; except that a dealer who signs an affidavit stating that the dealer will make payment in cash or by one of the other means specified in section 35-36-304 (1)(e) for each transaction for farm products shall pay the same application fee as a small-volume dealer;

Agents; and

Small-volume dealers.

For each fiscal year, commencing on July 1, twenty-five percent of the direct and indirect costs of administering and enforcing this part 3 must be funded from the general fund. The commission shall establish a fee schedule to cover any direct and indirect costs not funded from the general fund.

If a licensee fails for any reason to apply for the renewal of a license before an annual date specified by the commissioner by rule, the licensee shall, upon application for a renewal license and before the license is issued, pay a penalty as established by the commission, which penalty is in addition to the license fee.

The commissioner shall not issue a license to any person against whose surety a claim has been collected or any person against whom an irrevocable letter of credit has been drawn by the commissioner in accordance with this part 3 during the period of three years after the date of the collection; except that the commissioner may, in the commissioner's discretion and consistent with the purpose of this part 3, issue a temporary license to the person for the period, subject to such restrictions as the commissioner deems reasonable and necessary.

The commissioner shall not issue a renewal license to a licensee who is the subject of a pending verified complaint until the complaint has been settled to the satisfaction of the commissioner.

Upon the failure of an applicant to file a bond or an irrevocable letter of credit meeting the requirements of section 11-35-101.5, within ninety days after the date of application, the application will be rendered void, and the license fee will not be refunded. Any subsequent application for a license requires a new license fee.

Whenever the commissioner deems it appropriate, the commissioner may require a licensee or an applicant for an initial or renewal license to submit a financial statement or an audit prepared according to generally accepted accounting principles or any other information to determine whether the person is in an adequate financial position to carry out the person's duties as a licensee.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 742, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-37-105 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-304. Bonds and irrevocable letters of credit - exemptions.

Before the commissioner may issue a license to a dealer, the applicant shall file with the commissioner in the sum of not less than two thousand dollars nor more than one million dollars, at the discretion of the commissioner:

A bond executed by the applicant as principal and by a surety company qualified and authorized to do business in this state as a surety; or

An irrevocable letter of credit meeting the requirements of section 11-35-101.5.

The bond or irrevocable letter of credit must be conditioned upon compliance with this part 3 and section 35-36-104 and upon the faithful and honest handling of farm products in accordance with this part 3 and shall cover any fees due the department by the dealer and all costs and reasonable attorney fees incident to any suit upon the bond or irrevocable letter of credit. The bond or irrevocable letter of credit must be to the department in favor of every producer, dealer, small-volume dealer, or owner and, in the instance of a bond, must remain in full force and effect until canceled by the surety upon thirty days' prior written notice to the commissioner.

A producer, owner, small-volume dealer, or other dealer within the state of Colorado claiming to be injured by the fraud, deceit, or willful negligence of, or failure to comply with this part 3 or section 35-36-104 by, a dealer may request the department, as beneficiary, to demand payment on the irrevocable letter of credit or surety bond to recover the damages caused by the fraud, deceit, willful negligence, or failure to comply.

The surety on the bond or the issuer of the letter of credit is not liable to pay a claim pursuant to an action brought under this part 3 if the action is not commenced within five hundred forty-eight days, which is approximately eighteen months, after the date of the transaction, as that term is described in section 35-36-305 (12), on which the claim is based, or the date of the loss, as that term is defined in section 35-36-102 (20), whichever is later.

When an action is commenced on the bond or irrevocable letter of credit, the commissioner may require the licensee to file a new bond or irrevocable letter of credit, and failure of the licensee to file the new bond or irrevocable letter of credit within ten days after the commencement of the action constitutes grounds for the suspension or revocation of the licensee's license.

The commissioner shall not require a bond or irrevocable letter of credit from a dealer who pays for farm products in cash or with a bank-certified check, a bank cashier's check, an irrevocable electronic funds transfer, or a money order at the time the dealer obtains from the owner of the farm products possession or control of the farm products, or of an applicant for a license or a licensee operating under a bond required by the United States to secure the performance of the applicant's or licensee's obligations; except that the bond must include all obligations pertaining to Colorado farm products, and the dealer shall furnish documentary evidence to the commissioner that the bond required by the United States is in full force and effect.

The bond or irrevocable letter of credit required by section 35-36-216 must apply to the activities as a dealer of a person licensed pursuant to part 2 of this article 36. The persons are also subject to this section and section 35-36-305.

Whenever the commissioner determines that a previously approved bond or irrevocable letter of credit is, or for any cause has become, insufficient, the commissioner may require a dealer to furnish an additional bond or irrevocable letter of credit or other evidence of financial responsibility to conform to the requirements of this part 3 or any rule promulgated pursuant to this article 36. The failure of the dealer to comply with the commissioner's requirement within thirty days after written demand for compliance constitutes grounds for the suspension or revocation of the dealer's license.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 743, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-37-106 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-305. Investigations, hearings, and examinations.

For the purpose of enforcing this part 3, the commissioner may receive complaints from persons against a dealer, small-volume dealer, agent, or person assuming or attempting to act as a dealer, small-volume dealer, or agent and, upon the receipt of a complaint, may make any and all necessary investigations relative to the complaint.

The commissioner upon the commissioner's own motion may, and upon the verified complaint of any person shall, investigate any transactions involving this part 3.

The commissioner, upon consent of the licensee or upon obtaining an administrative search warrant, has free and unimpeded access to all buildings, yards, warehouses, and storage facilities owned by a licensee in which farm products are kept, stored, handled, processed, or transported.

The commissioner, upon consent of the licensee or upon obtaining a search warrant, has free and unimpeded access to all records required to be kept by the licensee and may make copies of the records.

The commissioner has full authority to administer oaths and take statements; to issue subpoenas requiring the attendance of witnesses and the production of all books, memoranda, papers, and other documents, articles, or instruments; and to compel the disclosure by the witnesses of all facts known to them relative to the matters under investigation. Upon the failure or refusal of a witness to obey a subpoena, the commissioner may petition the district court, and, upon a proper showing, the court may enter an order compelling the witness to appear and testify or produce documentary evidence. Failure to obey the order of the court is punishable as a contempt of court.

The commissioner may examine the ledgers, books, accounts, memoranda, and other documents and the farm products, scales, measures, and other items in connection with the business of a licensee relating to whatever transactions may be involved.

The commissioner need not investigate or act upon complaints regarding transactions that occurred more than one hundred twenty days before the date upon which the commissioner received the written complaint.

If the investigation is against a licensee, the commissioner shall proceed to ascertain the names and addresses of all producers, dealers, small-volume dealers, or owners of farm products, together with the accounts unaccounted for or due and owing to them by the licensee, and shall request all the producers, dealers, small-volume dealers, or owners to file verified statements of their respective claims with the commissioner. If, after the commissioner makes the request for verified statements, a producer, dealer, small-volume dealer, or owner fails, refuses, or neglects to file a verified statement in the office of the commissioner within thirty days after the date of the request, the commissioner is relieved of any further duty or action under this part 3 on behalf of the producer, dealer, small-volume dealer, or owner.

In the course of an investigation, the commissioner may attempt to effectuate a settlement between the respective parties.

If the commissioner determines, after concluding an investigation on a complaint, that reasonable grounds exist to believe that a licensee has violated this part 3 or section 35-36-104, the commissioner shall notify the licensee that the complaint is valid and inform the licensee of the licensee's opportunity to request a hearing, in writing, on the complaint within ten days after the date of the notice.

Upon the receipt of a request for a hearing from a licensee or if the commissioner determines that a hearing concerning a licensee is necessary, the commissioner shall cause a copy of the complaint or the grounds specified in section 35-36-306, together with a notice of the time and place of the hearing, to be served personally or by mail upon the licensee. Service shall be made at least ten days before the hearing, which shall be held in the city or town in which the business location of the licensee is situated, or in which the transactions involved allegedly occurred, or at the location deemed by the commissioner to be most convenient.

The commissioner shall conduct the hearing pursuant to section 24-4-105. Thereafter, the commissioner shall enter in the commissioner's office a decision specifying the relevant facts established at the hearing. If the commissioner determines from the facts specified that the licensee has not violated this part 3 or section 35-36-104, the commissioner shall dismiss the complaint. If the commissioner determines from the facts specified that the licensee has violated this part 3 or section 35-36-104, and that the licensee has not yet made complete restitution to the person complaining, the commissioner shall determine the amount of damages, if any, to which the person is entitled as the result of the violation and enter an order directing the offender to pay the person complaining the amount of damages on or before the date fixed in the order. The commissioner shall cause to be furnished a copy of the decision to all the respective parties to the complaint.

As a result of the hearing, the commissioner may also enter an order suspending or revoking the license of a licensee or may place the licensee on probation if the commissioner determines that the licensee has committed any of the unlawful acts specified in section 35-36-313 or that the licensee has violated this part 3 or section 35-36-104.

If a person against whom an order, as specified in subsection (8)(c) of this section, is made and issued fails, neglects, or refuses to obey the order within the time specified in the order, the commissioner may issue a further order to that person directing the person to show cause why the person's license should not be suspended or revoked for failure to comply with the order.

If the commissioner issues an order to show cause pursuant to subsection (10)(a) of this section, a copy of the order to show cause, together with a notice of the time and place of the hearing on the order to show cause, shall be served personally or by mail upon the person involved. Service shall be made at least ten days before the hearing, which shall be held in the city or town in which the business location of the licensee is situated or at any convenient place designated by the commissioner.

The commissioner shall conduct the hearing pursuant to section 24-4-105 and thereafter shall enter in the commissioner's office an order and decision specifying the facts established at the hearing and dismissing the order to show cause, directing the suspension or revocation of the license held by the licensee, or making such other conditional or probationary orders as may be proper. The commissioner shall cause a copy of the order and decision to be furnished to the licensee.

Nothing in this section limits the power of the commissioner to revoke or suspend a license when satisfied of the existence of any of the facts specified in section 35-36-313.

Whenever the absence of records or other circumstances makes it impossible or unreasonable for the commissioner to ascertain the names and addresses of all persons specified in subsection (6) of this section, the commissioner, after exercising due diligence and making a reasonable inquiry to secure the information from all reasonable and available sources, is not liable or responsible for the claims or the handling of claims that may subsequently appear or be discovered. After ascertaining all claims, assessments, and statements in the manner set forth in subsection (6) of this section, the commissioner may then demand payment on the bond or irrevocable letter of credit on behalf of those claimants whose claims have been determined by the commissioner as valid and, in the instance of a bond, may settle or compromise the claims with the surety company on the bond and execute and deliver a release and discharge of the bond involved. Upon the refusal of the surety company to pay the demand, the commissioner may bring an action on the bond on behalf of the producer, dealer, small-volume dealer, or owner.

For the purpose of this section, a transaction is deemed to have occurred:

On the date that possession of farm products is transferred by a claimant; or

On delayed payment transactions, on the contractual date of payment, or, if there is no contractual date of payment, thirty days following the transfer of title.

The commissioner has discretion to close from public inspection complaints of record made to the commissioner and the results of the commissioner's investigations during the investigatory period and until dismissed or until notice of hearing and charges is served on a licensee, unless otherwise provided by court order.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 744, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-37-107 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-306. Disciplinary powers - licenses.

The commissioner may deny an application for a license, refuse to renew a license, revoke or suspend a license, or place a licensee on probation, as the case may require, if the licensee or applicant has:

Violated this part 3 or section 35-36-104 or violated any of the rules promulgated by the commissioner pursuant to this article 36;

Been convicted of a felony under the laws of this state, any other state, or the United States; except that, in considering a conviction of a felony, the commissioner is governed by section 24-5-101;

Committed fraud or deception in the procurement or attempted procurement of a license;

Failed or refused to file with the commissioner a surety bond or an irrevocable letter of credit, as required by section 35-36-304;

Been determined by the commissioner to be in an inadequate financial position to meet liability obligations;

Failed to comply with a lawful order of the commissioner concerning the administration of this part 3; or

Had a license revoked, suspended, or not renewed or has been placed on probation in another state for cause, if the cause could be the basis for the same or similar disciplinary action in this state.

All proceedings concerning the denial, refusal to renew, revocation, or suspension of a license or the placing of a licensee on probation shall be conducted pursuant to section 35-36-305 and article 4 of title 24.

A previous violation of this part 3 or section 35-36-104 by the applicant or any person connected with the applicant in the business for which the applicant seeks to be licensed, or, in the case of a partnership or corporation applicant, any previous violations of this part 3 or section 35-36-104 by a partner, officer, director, or stockholder of more than thirty percent of the outstanding shares, is sufficient grounds for the denial of a license.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 747, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-37-108 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-307. Credit sale contracts - rules.

When a dealer or small-volume dealer purchases farm products for which payment has not been made, the dealer or small-volume dealer, within thirty days after the receipt of the farm products, shall provide the producer or owner of the farm products with a credit sale contract. The credit sale contract must contain the following information:

The type and quantity of farm products purchased and the date of purchase;

The charges for handling, if any;

The name and address of the producer or owner and the signature of the dealer or small-volume dealer or the authorized agent of the dealer or small-volume dealer;

The contract number required pursuant to subsection (4) of this section; and

One or more statements specified by the commissioner by rule, including one that warns a producer that entering into a credit sale contract entails a risk that the bond may not completely protect the producer from loss in the event of a failure of the dealer or small-volume dealer.

A dealer or small-volume dealer shall retain records of a dealer or small-volume dealer for a period of two years after the date of completion of the credit sale contracts, and the records must reflect those credit sale contracts that have been paid, canceled, or amended and those that are still open. The dealer or small-volume dealer shall keep the records at the dealer's or small-volume dealer's place of business at all times.

The commissioner shall require an annual report of the status of all of a dealer's or small-volume dealer's credit sale contracts along with the financial statement required under section 35-36-204 (1)(b).

A dealer or small-volume dealer shall consecutively number all credit sale contracts entered into by the dealer or small-volume dealer and make copies of the credit sale contracts available for inspection by the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized agents.

A dealer or small-volume dealer issuing credit sale contracts shall maintain positive working capital and a current ratio equal to or greater than one-to-one and reserves in an amount equaling or exceeding one hundred percent of the value of all of that dealer's or small-volume dealer's open credit sale contracts, which value shall be determined with reference to the daily bid price. The reserves may be in the form of any one or a combination of the following:

Cash;

Farm product assets, including farm products or other evidence of storage of farm products;

Credit sale contracts with other dealers or small-volume dealers licensed by the department; or

An irrevocable letter of credit in favor of the commissioner, which letter of credit is subject to section 35-36-216.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 748, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-37-111 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-308. Records of dealers.

Every dealer handling farm products for a consignor having received any farm products on commission for sale shall promptly make and keep a correct record, showing in detail the following with reference to the handling, sale, or storage of the farm products:

The name and address of the consignor;

The date received;

The condition and quantity upon arrival;

The date of the sale for the account of the consignor;

The price for which sold;

An itemized statement of the charges to be paid by the consignor in connection with the sale;

The names and addresses of the purchasers if the dealer has a financial interest in the business of the purchasers or if the purchasers have a financial interest in the business of the dealer, directly or indirectly, as a holder of the other's corporate stock, as a copartner, as a lender or borrower of money to or from the other, or in any other capacity;

A lot number or other identifying mark for each consignment, which number or mark must appear on all sales tags or other essential records needed to show what the product actually sold for; and

Any claims that have been or may be filed by the dealer against any person for overcharges or for damages resulting from the injury or deterioration of the farm products by the act, neglect, or failure of the person. The dealer shall make the records available for inspection by the commissioner and the consignor for whom the claims are made.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 749, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-37-112 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-309. Records of small-volume dealers.

Each small-volume dealer shall maintain records of all aspects of each purchase of farm products in the form and manner required by the commissioner.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 750, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-37-113 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-310. Daily reports and settlements.

When requested by a dealer's consignor, the dealer, before the close of the next business day following the sale of any farm products consigned to the dealer, shall transmit or deliver to the owner or consignor a true written report of the sale, showing the amount sold and the selling price. The dealer shall make remittance in full to the consigner of the amount realized from the sale, including all collections, overcharges, and damages, less the agreed commission and other charges together with a complete account of sales within ten days after the receipt of the money by the dealer unless otherwise agreed to in writing. In the account, the names and addresses of purchasers need not be given, except as required in section 35-36-308.

Every dealer shall retain a copy of the record covering each consignment transaction for a period of one year after the date of the consignment transaction, which copy the dealer shall, at all times, make available for, and open to, inspection by the commissioner and the consignor or the authorized representative of either.

Every dealer shall pay for farm products delivered to the dealer on the date and in the manner specified in the contract with the owner or, if no date is set by the contract or on the date of the delivery, within thirty days after the date of the delivery or the taking possession of the farm products.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 750, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-37-114 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-311. Pooled consignment.

Local produce or fruit associations or other shippers located in the neighborhood where farm products are grown may receive a reasonable compensation for loading, shipping, and securing persons to handle the products on commission in markets away from the locality where grown. Dealers receiving consignments of farm products from a number of consignors under written agreements or under written authority from them to market the products in season and prorate the net proceeds of the consignments among all consignors or to market the same in connection with other products of the same class may withhold the proportion of the net returns of sales of the consignments as may be necessary to carry out the agreements pertaining to the consignments until final sales have been made. In every case, final settlement shall be made within fifteen days after the final sale of the consignment, unless otherwise agreed to in writing by the consignor.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 751, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-37-115 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-312. Enforcement.

Whenever, upon sufficient evidence satisfactory to the commissioner, the commissioner determines a person has engaged in or is about to engage in an act or practice constituting a violation of this part 3 or of any rule or order promulgated under this article 36, the commissioner may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction to temporarily or permanently restrain or enjoin the act or practice in question and to enforce compliance with this part 3 or any rule or order pursuant to this article 36. In the action, the commissioner need not plead or prove irreparable injury or the inadequacy of a remedy at law. Under no circumstances shall the court require the commissioner to post a bond.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 751, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-37-116 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-313. Unlawful acts - definition.

It is unlawful and a violation of this part 3 for any person to:

Make fraudulent charges or returns for the handling, sale, or storage or for the rendering of any service in connection with the handling, sale, or storage of farm products. Violation of this subsection (1)(a) is a class 6 felony.

Willfully fail or refuse to render a true account of sales or storage or to make a settlement on sales or storage or to pay for farm products received within the time and in the manner required by this part 3. Violation of this subsection (1)(b) is a class 6 felony.

Intentionally make false or misleading statements as to the market conditions for farm products or false or misleading statements as to the condition, quality, or quantity of farm products received, handled, sold, or stored. Violation of this subsection (1)(c) is a class 6 felony.

Engage in fictitious sales, in collusion, or in unfair practices to defraud the owners. Violation of this subsection (1)(d) is a class 6 felony.

Act as a dealer, small-volume dealer, or agent without having obtained a license or act as a dealer without having filed a surety bond or an irrevocable letter of credit, as provided in this part 3. Violation of this subsection (1)(e) is a class 6 felony.

Willfully convert to the person's own use or benefit the farm products of another. Violation of this subsection (1)(f) is theft, as defined in section 18-4-401.

Commit fraud or deception in the procurement or attempted procurement of a license. Violation of this subsection (1)(g) is a class 2 misdemeanor.

Fail to comply with a lawful order of the commissioner concerning the administration of this part 3. Violation of this subsection (1)(h) is a class 2 misdemeanor.

Interfere with or hinder an authorized representative of the commissioner while performing the authorized representative's duties under this part 3. Violation of this subsection (1)(i) is a class 2 misdemeanor.

If licensed as a dealer or small-volume dealer, sell farm products for less than the current market price to any person with whom the dealer has a financial connection, directly or indirectly, either as an owner of the corporate stock of a corporation, as a copartner, or in any other capacity, or sell any farm products out of the purchase price of which the dealer or small-volume dealer receives, directly or indirectly, a portion of the purchase price other than the commission allowed in section 35-36-310. Violation of this subsection (1)(j) is theft, as defined in section 18-4-401.

Act as a dealer, small-volume dealer, or agent and, with intent to defraud, make, draw, utter, or deliver a check, draft, or order for the payment of money upon any bank or other depository to the owner for the purchase price of any farm products or any part of the farm products upon obtaining possession or control of the farm products, when at the time of the making, drawing, uttering, or delivery the maker or drawer has insufficient funds in or credit with the bank or other depository for the payment of the check, draft, or order in full upon its presentation. The making, drawing, uttering, or delivery of the check, draft, or order is prima facie evidence of an intent to defraud. "Credit", as used in this subsection (1)(k), means an arrangement or understanding with the bank or depository for the payment of the check, draft, or order. Violation of this subsection (1)(k) is fraud by check, as defined in section 18-5-205.

If acting as a dealer who has signed an affidavit in accordance with section 35-36-303 (1)(a)(I), fail to make payment in cash or by one of the other means specified in section 35-36-304 (1)(c) for any transaction without first complying with the bonding requirements of section 35-36-304. Violation of this subsection (1)(l) is a class 2 misdemeanor.

If licensed as a small-volume dealer, purchase twenty thousand dollars' worth or more of farm products in one year from the owner for processing or resale. Violation of this subsection (1)(m) is a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 751, § 2, effective June 29.

L. 2021:

(1)(g), (1)(h), (1)(i), (1)(l), and (1)(m) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3280, § 634, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-37-118 as it existed prior to 2020.

35-36-314. Penalties for theft of farm products.

If farm products are contracted for sale to an out-of-state purchaser, the purchaser is subject to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state in accordance with section 13-1-124 (1)(a). The seller is entitled to all remedies at law in seeking the return of the farm products when the purchaser takes delivery of the products but is unable or refuses to make payment for the products and the products have been physically removed to another state. The court shall give the action priority on the court's docket.

If a person purchases farm products in this state and removes the products to another state and issues a check in payment for those products knowing there are insufficient funds, as defined in section 18-5-205 (1)(d), to pay for the products, the person commits theft of farm products and shall be punished as provided in section 18-4-401 (2).

Source:

L. 2020:

Entire article amended with relocations, (HB 20-1213), ch. 160, p. 753, § 2, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-37-121 as it existed prior to 2020.